Utah statutes.
31A-23a-604.   Examination authority.

The acts of the managing general agent are considered to be the acts of the insurer on whose behalf it is acting.  A managing general agent may be examined as if it were the insurer.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 298, 2003 General Session

